Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.370

Wards—Division of city.

Notwithstanding that the charter of a city of the first class may forbid the city council from redividing the city into wards except at stated periods, if the city has failed to redivide the city into wards during any such period, the city council by ordinance may do so at any time thereafter: PROVIDED, That there shall not be more than one redivision into wards during any one period specified in the charter unless pursuant to RCW 29A.92.040 or 29A.92.110.

[ 2019 c 454 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.22.370. Prior: 1903 c 141 s 1; RRS s 8970.]

NOTES:

Retroactive application—Effective date—2019 c 454: See notes following RCW 29A.92.050.